Maine, session 132, LD1279.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §6089 is enacted to read:
§6089. Scallop biotoxin testing
1. Scallop biotoxin testing. As part of the Marine Shellfish Toxins Monitoring
Program under section 6076, the department shall conduct testing of cultured scallops for
biotoxins in the same manner as the testing for other cultured mollusks under the program,
including using high-performance liquid chromatography testing. The department shall
provide logistical support to a commercial fisheries business engaged in scallop
aquaculture in conducting the testing under this section, including providing transportation
of samples to be tested. For purposes of this section, "high-performance liquid
chromatography testing" means a testing technique in analytical chemistry that uses high-
pressure pumps to separate, identify and quantify specific components in mixtures.
2. Funding. The department shall carry out the purposes of this section through
appropriations, allocations, federal grants, donations from public or private sources or a
partnership with an organization having the purpose of supporting marine aquaculture.
Funds received under this subsection must be used for biotoxin testing and logistical
support for commercial fisheries businesses under subsection 1.
3. Report. By January 1st of each year, the department shall submit an annual report
detailing the number of commercial fisheries businesses using the testing under this section,
the overall impact on the scallop aquaculture industry, including economic growth and
cultured scallops landings, and recommendations for further improvements or expansions
of the testing under this section to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over marine resources matters.